Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.280

Cosmetology apprenticeship program.

(1) An approved cosmetology apprenticeship program is hereby created. The apprenticeship program allows for the direct entry of individuals into a training program approved as provided in this chapter and chapter 49.04 RCW.

(2) The department of licensing shall adopt rules, including a mandatory requirement that apprentices complete in-classroom theory courses as a part of their training, to provide for the licensure of participants of the apprenticeship program.

(3) Apprenticeship salon/shops participating in the apprenticeship program must:

(a) Be approved as an approved apprenticeship program conducted in an approved salon/shop by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council in accordance with chapter 49.04 RCW; and

(b) Provide the department with the names of all individuals acting as apprentice trainers.

(4) To act as an apprentice trainer, an individual must be approved by the department. To be approved, the trainer must hold a current license in the practice for which he or she is providing training and must have held that license for a minimum of three consecutive years.

(5) If an approved apprenticeship program or apprenticeship shop implements changes affecting the information required to be provided to the department under this section or rules adopted under this section, the revised information must be submitted to the department before implementing the changes.

(6) The director or the director's designee shall audit and inspect approved apprenticeship shops for compliance with this chapter at least annually. If the director determines that an approved apprenticeship shop is not maintaining the standards required by this chapter, written notice thereof must be given to the approved apprenticeship program and apprenticeship shop. An approved apprenticeship shop that fails to correct the conditions listed in the notice to the satisfaction of the director within a reasonable time may be subject to penalties imposed under RCW 18.235.110.

[ 2008 c 20 s 8; 2006 c 162 s 2; 2003 c 400 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—2006 c 162: "The legislature finds that direct-entry apprenticeship programs can be very beneficial to both students and employers. However, there is also concern that apprenticeship programs may reduce the number of students who enroll in traditional cosmetology school. The advisory committee is to update the legislature on the program with an updated final report by December 31, 2008, and is to include an evaluation of the effectiveness of the apprenticeship program, including but not limited to the number of apprentices who complete the program, the number of apprentices who take and pass the licensing examination, and a formal review of any impact the expansion of such an apprenticeship program may have on the enrollment of traditional cosmetology schools, including but not limited to whether the enrollment of traditional cosmetology schools is negatively impacted by the direct-entry apprenticeship programs." [ 2006 c 162 s 1.]

Effective date—2003 c 400: "This act takes effect September 15, 2003." [ 2003 c 400 s 6.]